Utah statutes.
17-53-309.   Approval of cost-increase changes in plans and specifications -- Delegation.

(1) If the county executive adopts plans and specifications for the alteration, construction, or repair of any public building or other public structure, the plans and specifications may not be altered or changed in any manner that would increase the cost of altering, constructing, or repairing the building or structure, unless the county executive approves the alteration or change in the plans and specifications.

(2)  The county executive may adopt policies and procedures to delegate authority to approve alterations or changes in plans and specifications to a county employee, including the county engineer, architect, surveyor, or director of the department or division responsible for the work.

